Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.60.030

Adoption of rules.

The director shall adopt all rules necessary to implement sections 2 through 6, chapter 329, Laws of 1985 by January 1, 1986.

[ 1994 c 92 s 159; 1985 c 329 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.60.030.]